Illinois, session 104th, HB4551.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Charitable Games Act is amended by changing 5Sections 4, 5, 5.1, and 6 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 30/4)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1124)7    Sec. 4. Licensing Restrictions. Licensing for the 8conducting of charitable games is subject to the following 9restrictions:10        (1) The license application, when submitted to the 11    Department of Revenue, must contain a sworn statement 12    attesting to the not-for-profit character of the 13    prospective licensee organization, signed by a person 14    listed on the application as an owner, officer, or other 15    person in charge of the necessary day-to-day operations. 16    The application shall contain the name of the person in 17    charge of and primarily responsible for the conduct of the 18    charitable games. The person so designated shall be 19    present on the premises continuously during charitable 20    games.21        (2) The license application shall be prepared by the 22    prospective licensee organization or its duly authorized 23    representative in accordance with the rules of the   HB4551- 2 -LRB104 18479 LNS 31921 b1    Department of Revenue.2        (2.1) The organization shall maintain among its books 3    and records a list of the names, addresses, social 4    security numbers, and dates of birth of all persons who 5    will participate in the management or operation of the 6    games, along with a sworn statement made under penalties 7    of perjury, signed by a person listed on the application 8    as an owner, officer, or other person in charge of the 9    necessary day-to-day operations, that the persons listed 10    as participating in the management or operation of the 11    games are bona fide members, volunteers as defined in 12    Section 2, or employees of the applicant or suppliers 13    licensee, that these persons have not participated in the 14    management or operation of more than 48 12 charitable 15    games events conducted by any licensee in the calendar 16    year, and that these persons will receive no remuneration 17    or compensation, directly or indirectly from any source, 18    for participating in the management or operation of the 19    games. Any amendments to this listing must contain an 20    identical sworn statement.21        (2.2) (Blank).22        (3) Each license shall state the date, hours and at 23    what locations the licensee is permitted to conduct 24    charitable games.25        (4) Each licensee shall file a copy of the license 26    with each police department or, if in unincorporated   HB4551- 3 -LRB104 18479 LNS 31921 b1    areas, each sheriff's office whose jurisdiction includes 2    the premises on which the charitable games are authorized 3    under the license.4        (5) The licensee shall prominently display the license 5    in the area where the licensee is to conduct charitable 6    games. The licensee shall likewise display, in the form 7    and manner prescribed by the Department, the provisions of 8    Section 9 of this Act. 9        (6) (Blank).10        (7) (Blank).11        (8) A license is not assignable or transferable.12        (9) The Unless the premises for conducting charitable 13    games are provided by a municipality, the Department shall 14    not issue a license permitting a person, firm or 15    corporation to sponsor a charitable games night if the 16    premises for the conduct of the charitable games has been 17    previously used for 48 12 charitable games nights during 18    the previous 12 months.19        (10) Auxiliary organizations of a licensee shall not 20    be eligible for a license to conduct charitable games, 21    except for auxiliary organizations of veterans 22    organizations as authorized in Section 2.23        (11) Charitable games must be conducted in accordance 24    with local building and fire code requirements.25        (12) The licensee shall consent to allowing the 26    Department's employees to be present on the premises   HB4551- 4 -LRB104 18479 LNS 31921 b1    wherein the charitable games are conducted and to inspect 2    or test equipment, devices and supplies used in the 3    conduct of the game.4    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit a 5licensee that conducts charitable games on its own premises 6from also obtaining a providers' license in accordance with 7Section 5.1. The maximum number of charitable games events 8that may be held in any one premises is limited to no more than 912 charitable games events per calendar year.10(Source: P.A. 98-377, eff. 1-1-14; 98-1071, eff. 8-26-14.) 11    (230 ILCS 30/5)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1125)12    Sec. 5. Providers' License. The Department shall issue a 13providers' license permitting a person, firm or corporation to 14provide premises for the conduct of charitable games. No 15person, firm or corporation may rent or otherwise provide 16premises without having first obtained a license. Applications 17for providers' licenses shall be made in writing in accordance 18with Department rules. The Department shall license providers 19of charitable games at a nonrefundable annual fee of $50, or 20nonrefundable triennial license fee of $150. Each providers' 21license is valid for one year from the date of issuance, or 3 22years from date of issuance for a triennial license, unless 23extended, suspended, or revoked by Department action before 24that date. Any extension of a providers' license shall not 25exceed one year. A provider may receive reasonable   HB4551- 5 -LRB104 18479 LNS 31921 b1compensation for the provision of the premises. Reasonable 2expenses shall include only those expenses defined as 3reasonable by rules adopted by the Department. A provider, 4other than a municipality, may not provide the same premises 5for conducting more than 12 charitable games nights per year. 6A provider shall not have any interest in any suppliers' 7business, either direct or indirect. A municipality may 8provide the same premises for conducting 48 charitable games 9nights during a 12-month period. No employee, officer, or 10owner of a provider may participate in the management or 11operation of a charitable games event, even if the employee, 12officer, or owner is also a member, volunteer, or employee of 13the charitable games licensee. A provider may not promote or 14solicit a charitable games event on behalf of a charitable 15games licensee or qualified organization. Any qualified 16organization licensed to conduct a charitable game need not 17obtain a providers' license if such games are to be conducted 18on the organization's premises.19(Source: P.A. 98-377, eff. 1-1-14.) 20    (230 ILCS 30/5.1)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1125.1)21    Sec. 5.1. If a licensee conducts charitable games on its 22own premises, the licensee may also obtain a providers' 23license in accordance with Section 5 to allow the licensee to 24rent or otherwise provide its premises to another licensee for 25the conducting of an additional 8 4 charitable games events.   HB4551- 6 -LRB104 18479 LNS 31921 b1The maximum number of charitable games events that may be held 2at any one premises is limited to 48 12 charitable games events 3per calendar year.4(Source: P.A. 98-1071, eff. 8-26-14.) 5    (230 ILCS 30/6)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1126)6    Sec. 6. Supplier's license. The Department shall issue a 7supplier's license permitting a person, firm, or corporation 8to sell, lease, lend or distribute to any organization 9licensed to conduct charitable games, supplies, devices, and 10other equipment designed for use in the playing of charitable 11games. No person, firm, or corporation shall sell, lease, 12lend, or distribute charitable games supplies or equipment 13without having first obtained a license. Applications for 14suppliers' licenses shall be made in writing in accordance 15with Department rules. The Department shall license suppliers 16of charitable games subject to a nonrefundable annual fee of 17$500, or a nonrefundable triennial fee of $1,500. Each 18supplier's license is valid for one year from the date of 19issuance, or 3 years from date of issuance for a triennial 20license, unless extended, suspended, or revoked by Department 21action before that date. Any extension of a supplier's license 22shall not exceed one year. No licensed supplier under this Act 23shall lease, lend, or distribute charitable gaming equipment, 24supplies, or other devices to persons not otherwise licensed 25to conduct charitable games under this Act. The Department may   HB4551- 7 -LRB104 18479 LNS 31921 b1require by rule for the provision of surety bonds by 2suppliers. A supplier shall keep among its books and records 3and make available for inspection by the Department a list of 4all products and equipment offered for sale or lease to any 5organization licensed to conduct charitable games, and all 6such products and equipment shall be sold or leased at the 7prices shown on the books and records. A supplier shall keep 8all such products and equipment segregated and separate from 9any other products, materials or equipment that it might own, 10sell, or lease. A supplier must include in its application for 11a license the exact location of the storage of the products, 12materials, or equipment. A supplier, as a condition of 13licensure, must consent to permitting the Department's 14employees to enter supplier's premises to inspect and test all 15equipment and devices. A supplier shall keep books and records 16for the furnishing of products and equipment to charitable 17games separate and distinct from any other business the 18supplier might operate. All products and equipment supplied 19must be in accord with the Department's rules and regulations. 20A supplier shall not alter or modify any equipment or 21supplies, or possess any equipment or supplies so altered or 22modified, so as to allow the possessor or operator of the 23equipment to obtain a greater chance of winning a game other 24than as under normal rules of play of such games. The supplier 25shall not require an organization to pay a percentage of the 26proceeds from the charitable games for the use of the products   HB4551- 8 -LRB104 18479 LNS 31921 b1or equipment. The supplier shall file a quarterly return with 2the Department listing all sales or leases for such quarter 3and the gross proceeds from such sales or leases. A supplier 4shall permanently affix his name to all charitable games 5equipment, supplies and pull tabs. A supplier shall not have 6any interest in any providers' business, either direct or 7indirect. If the supplier leases his equipment for use at an 8unlicensed charitable games or to an unlicensed sponsoring 9group, all equipment so leased is forfeited to the State.10    Organizations licensed to conduct charitable games may own 11their own equipment. Such organizations must apply to the 12Department for an ownership permit. Any such application must 13be accompanied by a one-time, nonrefundable fee of $50. Such 14organizations shall file an annual report listing their 15inventory of charitable games equipment. Such organizations 16may lend such equipment without compensation to other licensed 17organizations without applying for a suppliers license.18    No employee, owner, or officer of a supplier may 19participate in the management or operation of a charitable 20games event, even if the employee, owner, or officer is also a 21member, volunteer, or employee of the charitable games 22licensee. A supplier may not promote or solicit a charitable 23games event on behalf of a charitable games licensee or 24qualified organization. An employee of a supplier may assist 25the charity in a charitable games event. 26(Source: P.A. 94-986, eff. 6-30-06; 95-228, eff. 8-16-07.)